Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2312.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:* * *(a.2) Beginning December 1, 2026, and each December 1 thereafter, the minimum wage required under this section shall be increased by the same percentage calculated for the annual cost-of-living adjustment to the salary of members of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 General Assembly under section 4(d)(1) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2312PN3071 - 2 - 12345